Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-204
Finance and development entities; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the Nebraska Mortgage Finance Fund, the Nebraska Development Finance Fund, and the Agricultural Development Corporation have effectuated their respective public purposes.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 4.